Utah statutes.
76-8-104.   Threats to influence official or political action.

(1)  A person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if he threatens any harm to a public servant, party official, or voter with a purpose of influencing his action, decision, opinion, recommendation, nomination, vote, or other exercise of discretion.

(2)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Harm" means any disadvantage or injury, pecuniary or otherwise, including disadvantage or injury to any other person or entity in whose welfare the public servant, party official, or voter is interested.

(b)  "Public servant" does not include jurors.

